Illinois, session 104th, HB5533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Purpose. The General Assembly has determined 5that it is in the best interests of the State and the State's 6citizens that all high school students be required to take a 7one semester course in financial literacy prior to graduation. 8Financial literacy is essential for students to make informed 9decisions about budgeting, saving, investing, credit 10management, and long-term financial planning. Many young 11adults enter the workforce without adequate knowledge of 12personal finance, leading to poor financial decisions that can 13impact their economic well-being throughout their lives. 14Requiring financial literacy education in high schools will 15better prepare students for financial independence and 16economic success.17    Research has shown that a financial literacy course is 18significantly more effective if taught as a separate course in 19grade 11 or 12 rather than embedded in another course or taught 20at an earlier time. Similarly, research has shown that before 21the course can be implemented, there must be time to develop 22curriculum and provide incentives for professional development 23for teachers of the course.   HB5533- 2 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 227-305 and 27-605 as follows: 3    (105 ILCS 5/27-305)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-12.1)4    Sec. 27-305. Financial literacy Consumer education. 5    (a) For pupils entering grade 9 before the 2029-2030 6school year, pupils Pupils in the public schools in grades 9 7through 12 shall be taught and be required to study courses 8which include instruction in the area of financial literacy 9consumer education, including but not necessarily limited to 10(i) understanding the basic concepts of financial literacy, 11including consumer debt and installment purchasing (including 12credit scoring, managing credit debt, and completing a loan 13application), budgeting, savings and investing, banking 14(including balancing a checkbook, opening a deposit account, 15and the use of interest rates), understanding simple 16contracts, State and federal income taxes, personal insurance 17policies, the comparison of prices, higher education student 18loans, identity-theft security, and homeownership (including 19the basic process of obtaining a mortgage and the concepts of 20fixed and adjustable rate mortgages, subprime loans, and 21predatory lending), and (ii) understanding the roles of 22consumers interacting with agriculture, business, labor unions 23and government in formulating and achieving the goals of the 24mixed free enterprise system. The State Board of Education 25shall devise or approve the consumer education curriculum for   HB5533- 3 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1grades 9 through 12 and specify the minimum amount of 2instruction to be devoted thereto.3    (a-5) Beginning the 2029-2030 school year, pupils entering 4grade 9 in the public schools shall be taught and required to 5complete a stand-alone, one-semester or equivalent course 6covering financial literacy to be completed in grade 11 or 12. 7The course may be offered as a stand-alone course or 8integrated into existing required coursework in mathematics, 9social studies, or career and technical education, as long as 10all required competencies are met. The financial literacy 11course shall include, but not be limited to: instruction 12covering earning income, including understanding pay 13statements and the difference between gross and net pay; 14budgeting and financial planning, including tracking income 15and expenses; saving and investing, including the power of 16compound interest, retirement accounts, and basic investment 17vehicles; credit management, including understanding credit 18scores, interest rates, credit cards, and consequences of 19debt; consumer protection, including identity theft 20prevention, understanding contracts, and recognizing financial 21fraud; insurance and risk management, including health, 22automobile, life, disability, and property insurance; taxes, 23including federal and State income taxes and basic tax filing; 24banking services, including checking and saving accounts, 25electronic payments, and online banking; major purchases, 26including understanding automobile loans, mortgages, and lease   HB5533- 4 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1agreements; and higher education financing, including students 2loans, financial aid, and higher education cost 3considerations. The financial literacy education standards for 4the course shall consider any recommendations from the 5Financial Literacy Implementation Committee under subsection 6(f). The State Board of Education may review and update 3 7curriculum standards every 5 years. The State Board of 8Education may adopt rules or national standards for financial 9literacy education in implementing the curriculum standards. 10    A school board shall oversee implementation of the 11financial literacy course for each high school student prior 12to graduation. 13    The State Board of Education shall develop implementation 14guidelines and timelines to assist schools in implementing the 15financial literacy course under this subsection, considering 16any recommendations from the Financial Literacy Implementation 17Committee under subsection (f). 18    (b) (Blank).19    (c) (Blank).20    (d) A school board may establish a special fund in which to 21receive public funds and private contributions for the 22promotion of financial literacy. Money in the fund shall be 23used for the following:24        (1) Defraying the costs of financial literacy training 25    for teachers.26        (2) Rewarding a school or teacher who wins or achieves   HB5533- 5 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1    results at a certain level of success in a financial 2    literacy competition.3        (3) Rewarding a student who wins or achieves results 4    at a certain level of success in a financial literacy 5    competition.6        (4) Funding activities, including books, games, field 7    trips, computers, and other activities, related to 8    financial literacy education.9    (e) The State Board of Education, upon the next 10comprehensive review of the Illinois Learning Standards, is 11urged to include the instruction in subsection (a-5), basic 12principles of personal insurance policies, and understanding 13simple contracts.14    (f) The State Board of Education shall establish a 15Financial Literacy Implementation Committee no later than June 1630, 2027 to make recommendations to the State Superintendent 17of Education concerning the implementation of subsection 18(a-5).19    The Committee shall include the following members:20        (1) the State Superintendent of Education, or the 21    State Superintendent's designee, who shall serve as ex 22    officio and as chairperson of the Committee;23        (2) the Director of K-12 Curriculum and Instruction at 24    the State Board of Education, or the Director's designee;25        (3) one member appointed by the State Treasurer;26        (4) two members representing organized labor,   HB5533- 6 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1    appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of 2    the Senate;3        (5) two members representing school districts, 4    appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of 5    the Senate; and6        (6) two members representing State insurance 7    professional trade associations and selected to ensure 8    that the diversity of this State is represented, appointed 9    by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.10    Members of the Committee shall serve without compensation. 11The State Board of Education shall provide administrative 12support to the Committee.13    The Committee shall hold its first meeting no later than 1490 days following the establishment of the Committee and shall 15meet quarterly thereafter. At each quarterly meeting, the 16State Superintendent of Education shall make a report to the 17Committee. All meetings of the Committee shall be open to the 18public.19    The State Board of Education shall present regular and 20timely reports to the Committee regarding the implementation 21of subsection (a-5), including, but not limited to, 22engagement, system operations, and resources allocated. The 23State Board of Education shall gather stakeholder input in 24preparing the reports for the Committee.25    Members of the Committee shall serve until July 1, 2029, 26at which time the State Board of Education shall dissolve the   HB5533- 7 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1Committee.2    This subsection is inoperative after July 1, 2029. 3(Source: P.A. 103-616, eff. 7-1-24; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/27-605)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-22)5    Sec. 27-605. Required high school courses. 6    (a) (Blank). 7    (b) (Blank).8    (c) (Blank).9    (d) (Blank).10    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 11to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 129th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 13successfully complete all of the following courses:14        (1) Four years of language arts.15        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 16    which must be English and the other of which may be English 17    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 18    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 19    graduation requirements. 20        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 21    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 22    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 23    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 24    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 25    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education   HB5533- 8 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 2    path.3        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 4    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 5    of a course that includes intensive instruction in 6    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 7    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 8    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 9        (4) Two years of science.10        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 11    year must be history of the United States or a combination 12    of history of the United States and American government 13    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 14    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 15    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 16    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 17    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 18    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 19    content shall focus on government institutions, the 20    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 21    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. 22    School districts may utilize private funding available for 23    the purposes of offering civics education. Beginning with 24    pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school 25    year, one semester, or part of one semester, may include a 26    financial literacy course.  HB5533- 9 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 2    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 3    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 4    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 5    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 6    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 7    requirement under this subdivision (6). 8    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 9prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 10entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 11requirements, successfully complete all of the following 12courses: 13        (1) Four years of language arts.14        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 15    which must be English and the other of which may be English 16    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 17    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other 18    graduation requirements.19        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 20    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 21    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 22    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 23    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 24    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 25    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 26    path.  HB5533- 10 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 2    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English, 3    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 4    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 5    requirements. 6        (4) Two years of laboratory science.7        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 8    year must be history of the United States or a combination 9    of history of the United States and American government 10    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 11    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 12    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 13    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 14    Civics course content shall focus on government 15    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 16    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 17    democratic process. School districts may utilize private 18    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 19    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 20    include a financial literacy course.21        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 22    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 23    American Sign Language, (D) career and technical 24    education, or (E) forensic speech (speech and debate). A 25    forensic speech course used to satisfy the course 26    requirement under subdivision (1) may not be used to   HB5533- 11 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1    satisfy the course requirement under this subdivision (6). 2    (e-10) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a 3prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 4entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 5requirements, successfully complete 2 years of foreign 6language courses, which may include American Sign Language. A 7pupil may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy 8the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5). 9    (e-15) Beginning with the 2029-2030 school year, as a 10prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 11entering the 9th grade must successfully complete one semester 12or the equivalent of a stand-alone course on personal finance 13education to be taken in grade 11 or 12, which may be counted 14toward the fulfillment of other graduation requirements under 15subsection (e-5) as determined by the State Board of 16Education. 17    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 18school districts of standards for writing-intensive 19coursework. 20    (f-5) If a school district offers an Advanced Placement 21computer science course to high school students, then the 22school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 23high school mathematics course and must denote on the 24student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 25science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative 26course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of   HB5533- 12 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1subsection (e) of this Section. 2    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 3the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 4or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 5determined by an individualized education program. 6    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the 79th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 8or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 9determined by an individualized education program. 10    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 11pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 12prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 13course of study is determined by an individualized education 14program. 15    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 16grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 17students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 18by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 19not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 20school year or a prior school year or to students with 21disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 22individualized education program. 23    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 24provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-610 of this Code and the 25Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act. 26    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify   HB5533- 13 -LRB104 19960 LNS 33410 b1the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in 2grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 3to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 4Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 5(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 8-2-24; 6104-387, eff. 8-15-25; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25; revised 79-24-25.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.